Maryland, session 2026, SB0839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–107.1.
(A) BEGINNING IN 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT THE
IN–STATE COST–OF–DISPENSING SURVEY AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 3 YEARS.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR IN WHICH THE SURVEY
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION IS CONDUCTED, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT
THE RESULTS OF THE SURVEY TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
15–118.2.
WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE COMPLETION OF THE IN–STATE
COST–OF–DISPENSING SURVEY, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS
ESTABLISHING A FEE–FOR–SERVICE PROFESSIONAL DISPENSING FEE BASED ON
THE RESULTS OF THE SURVEY.
– 1 –

Ch. 708 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –